Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DULUTH CHILDREN'S MUSEUM.new text end new text begin $1,700,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Duluth Children's Museum, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to design, construct, furnish, and equip capital improvements for an expansion of the museum building in the city of Duluth. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end